Hawaii statutes.
§657-6 Four years; causes arising in
foreign jurisdiction, etc. Subject to section 657-9, actions for the
recovery of any debt founded upon any contract, obligation, or liability, where
the cause of action has arisen in any foreign jurisdiction including actions on
judgments or decrees rendered in any court not a court of record in any foreign
jurisdiction but not such as are brought upon the judgment or decree of a court
of record, shall be commenced within four years after the cause of action
accrued, and not after. [L 1892, c 26, §1; RL 1925, §2644; RL 1935, §3915; am L
1943, c 139, §2; RL 1945, §10426; RL 1955, §241-6; HRS §657-6]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next